Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

3-1-101. Title.

This act shall be known, and may be cited in all legal proceedings, as the “Arkansas Alcoholic Control Act”.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 1, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 14101; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-101.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 9, repealed all laws or parts of laws in conflict with the act, but provided that the act was not intended to repeal or conflict with the taxing provisions of Acts 1934 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 4 and 9, or Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7. Additionally, the section stated that if there was a conflict between the taxing provisions, the provisions of the acts mentioned would govern. Acts 1934 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 4 was superseded by §3-5-401 et seq. [repealed]. Acts 1934 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 9 was superseded by §3-6-101 et seq. Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7 is codified as ch. 5, subch. 2 of this title.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this title unless otherwise provided:

(1)

“Block” means the area on both sides of that portion of a street lying between intersecting streets and extending back, on both sides, halfway to the next parallel street;

(2)

“Dispensary” means any store which, under the provisions of this title unless otherwise provided and having paid all taxes required by the state, sells at retail, in unbroken packages, for consumption off the premises, any intoxicating alcoholic liquor as defined by this title unless otherwise provided;

(3)

“Excluded felony offense” means:

(A)(i)

A felony offense as determined by the jurisdiction where the felony offense occurred.

(ii)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall determine whether an offense is a felony offense based upon a review of the relevant court records concerning the conviction for the offense; or

(B)

A violation of a state or federal controlled-substance law that was classified as a felony in the jurisdiction where the person was convicted, but not including:

(i)

An offense for which the sentence, including any term of probation, incarceration, or supervised release, was completed ten (10) or more years earlier; or

(ii)

An offense that has been sealed by a court or for which a pardon has been granted;

(4)

“Hard cider” means liquor brewed from the fermented juices of fruit and containing more than three percent (3%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight;

(5)(A)

“Malt” means liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and containing more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight.

(B)

Beer containing not more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight and all other malt beverages containing not more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight are not defined as “malt liquors” and are excepted from each and every provision of this act;

(6)

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in the business of distilling, brewing, making, blending, rectifying, or producing for sale in wholesale quantities alcoholic liquors of any kind, including whiskey, brandy, cordials, liquors, ales, beers, hard cider, or other liquids containing alcohol, except wines;

(7)

“Person” means any and all corporations, partnerships, associations, or individuals;

(8)

“Sealed” means to expunge, remove, sequester, and treat as confidential the record or records of a felony offense;

(9)

“Spirituous” means liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables and containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight, or any other liquids containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight; and

(10)

“Vinous” means the fermented juices of fruits, except native wine, containing more than five percent (5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight.

(b)

All other words used in this act shall be defined according to the statutes in such case made and provided, if any, and otherwise shall be defined according to the custom and usage of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 1, §§ 1-3, 5-7; Pope's Dig., §§ 14094-14096, 14098-14100; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-102 — 48-104, 48-106 — 48-108; Acts 2015, No. 1237, § 1; 2017, No. 739, § 1; 2019, No. 691, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted the definition for “Hard cider”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment substituted “title unless otherwise provided” for “act, unless the context otherwise requires” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “title unless otherwise provided” for “act” twice in (a)(2); inserted the definitions for “Excluded felony offense” and “Sealed”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “hard cider” in (6).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-1-101.

3-1-103. Exempted products.

(a)(1)

The provisions of this act shall not in any manner be construed to apply to the manufacture, sale, and distribution of wines or vinous liquors manufactured, sold, and distributed by residents of Arkansas.

(2)

All wines or vinous liquors which shall be manufactured without the confines of this state shall be legally sold, imported, transported, possessed, and consumed only upon payment of the same privilege and excise taxes as provided for all other alcoholic liquors which are included and legalized under the provisions of this act, and traffic in such vinous liquors shall be subject to all rules provided herein.

(b)

Malt and vinous beverages containing more than three and two-tenths percent (3.2%) of alcohol by weight and not more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight shall be taxed and regulated as provided for malt and vinous beverages containing not more than three and two-tenths percent (3.2%) alcohol by weight under the provisions of chapter 5, subchapter 2 of this title.

(c)(1)

After having been manufactured and prepared for the market, the articles enumerated in this subsection are not subject to this act:

(A)

Denatured alcohol or denatured rum produced and used as provided by laws and regulations now or hereinafter in force;

(B)

Medicinal preparations manufactured in accordance with formulae prescribed in the United States Pharmacopoeia — National Formulary, or by the American Institute of Homeopathy that are unfit for the use for beverage purposes;

(C)

Patented, patent, and proprietary medicines that are unfit for use for beverage purposes;

(D)

Toilet, medicinal, and antiseptic preparations and solutions that are unfit for use for beverage purposes;

(E)

Flavoring extracts and syrups that are unfit for use as a beverage or for intoxicating beverage purposes;

(F)

Vinegar and preserved sweet cider;

(G)

Alcohol medicated according to such formulae as will render it unfit for beverage purposes and which is to be sold for legitimate external use;

(H)

Alcohol for mechanical and scientific purposes if unfit for a beverage;

(I)

Wines; and

(J)

Confectionery containing less than five percent (5%) by volume of alcohol, if the alcohol is in a nonliquid form as a result of being mixed with other substances.

(2)

Any person who manufactures, purchases, or possesses any of the articles mentioned in this subsection or preparations fit for beverage purposes which are authorized to be manufactured, which may be used in the manufacture of other preparations compounded in accordance with formulae prescribed in the United States Pharmacopoeia — National Formulary, or by the American Institute of Homeopathy, which preparations when so manufactured are unfit for use for beverage purposes, or in the manufacture of patented, patent, and proprietary or other medicines, or for physicians' prescriptions, which are unfit for use for beverage purposes, may purchase and possess liquors for that purpose. Such person shall keep such records as are required by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(3)

No such manufacturer shall sell, use, or dispose of any liquor otherwise than as an ingredient of the articles authorized to be manufactured therefrom.

(4)

No more alcohol shall be used in the manufacture of any syrup or extract than the quantity necessary for the extraction or solution of the elements mentioned therein and for the preservation of the article.

(5)

The provisions of this act shall not apply to pure, ethyl, or denatured alcohol intended for use or used for scientific, chemical, mechanical, industrial, medicinal, or culinary purposes or for use in the manufacture of patented, patent, proprietary, medicinal, pharmaceutical, antiseptic, toilet, scientific, chemical, mechanical, and industrial preparations or products, unfit for beverage purposes. Any person taking advantage of this subsection shall keep any records as are required by the director.

(6)

Any person who shall knowingly sell any of the articles mentioned in this subsection for beverage purposes or any extract or syrup for intoxicating beverage purposes, or who shall sell any of the same under circumstances for which the seller might reasonably deduce the intention of the purchaser to use them for such purpose, shall be subject to the penalties provided in this act.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 1, § 6; 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 21; 1935, No. 108, Art. 8, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 14099, 14126, 14171; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-107, 48-109, 48-110; Acts 2017, No. 1035, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 31.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “are not subject to” for “shall not be subject to the provisions of” in (c)(1); and added (c)(1)(J).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-1-101.

Cross References.

Denatured alcohol, sale for beverage purposes prohibited, §3-3-214.

3-1-104. Industry member conduct — Donation of intoxicating liquor.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Industry member” means any one (1) or more of the following:

(A)

A distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, wholesaler, or distributor of intoxicating liquor that holds a valid and appropriate permit issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(B)

An agent of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, wholesaler, or distributor of intoxicating liquor, including without limitation an employee, shareholder, owner, partner, corporate officer, or director; or

(C)

A business paid by a distiller, manufacturer, importer, producer, wholesaler, or distributor of intoxicating liquor to assist in targeting and promoting the sale of intoxicating liquor, including without limitation an advertising agency or marketing firm; and

(2)

“Retailer” means a person or business that:

(A)

Is devoted wholly or partially to the sale of intoxicating liquor at retail; and

(B)

Holds a valid retailer's permit issued by the division.

(b)

An industry member or retailer may donate intoxicating liquor for on-premises consumption at a function to a charitable or nonprofit organization that does not have a permit to dispense intoxicating liquors if the premises used by the nonprofit organization has a permit for on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, if a permit is required by applicable law.

(c)

An industry member may provide keg-tapping equipment and hook-up service to a charitable or nonprofit organization at a function.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 527, § 1.

3-1-105. Posting of warning signs relating to drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy — Definition.

(a)

A person that has received a permit from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages shall post in a conspicuous place at the permitted premises a printed sign warning of the dangers of drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy that meets the requirements under §3-9-102.

(b)

As used in this section, “alcoholic beverages” means all beverages containing more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 860, § 1.